Massachusetts, session 194th, H3189.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following: --
All vendors that collect tax under the provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to retain
an amount equal to 2 per cent of the total amount of tax collected in any one calendar year. The
total amount so retained in any calendar year by any 1 vendor, when combined with the taxes
retained as provided in section 6 of chapter 64I, shall not exceed $750. The vendor shall retain
these amounts by deducting not more than 2 per cent of the tax collected during the standard
reporting period. Upon reaching the annual maximum retention amount, the vendor shall not be
entitled to deduct any further amount from taxes collected until the beginning of the next
calendar year.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 6 of chapter 64I of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following: --
All vendors that collect tax under the provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to retain
an amount equal to 2 per cent of the total amount of tax collected in any one calendar year. The
total amount so retained in any calendar year by any 1 vendor, when combined with the taxes
retained as provided in section 5 of chapter 64H, shall not exceed $750. The vendor shall retain
these amounts by deducting not more than 2 per cent of the tax collected during the standard
reporting period. Upon reaching the annual maximum retention amount, the vendor shall not be
entitled to deduct any further amount from taxes collected until the beginning of the next
calendar year.
of 2